Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.170

Refund of contributions on discontinuance of service—Reentry.

(1) Should service of a member be discontinued except by death, disability, or retirement, the member shall, upon application therefor, be paid the accumulated contributions within sixty days after the day of application and the rights to all benefits as a member shall cease: PROVIDED, That any member with at least five years' service may elect the provisions of RCW 41.26.090(2).

(2) Any member whose contributions have been paid in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and who reenters the service of an employer shall upon the restoration of withdrawn contributions, which restoration must be completed within a total period of five years of service following resumption of employment, then receive credit toward retirement for the period of previous service which these contributions are to cover.

(3) If the member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (2) of this section, the member may make the payment required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement. The member shall then receive credit toward retirement for the period of previous service that the withdrawn contributions cover.

[ 1994 c 197 s 6; 1991 c 35 s 24; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 22.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.